Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-3209
When creditor process enforceable against financial institution.

(a) Subject to subsection (b), creditor process with respect to a special deposit is not enforceable against the financial institution holding the special deposit.

(b) Creditor process is enforceable against the financial institution holding a special deposit with respect to an amount the financial institution is obligated to pay a beneficiary or a depositor if the process:

(1) is served on the financial institution;

(2) provides sufficient information to permit the financial institution to identify the depositor or the beneficiary from the financial institution's books and records; and

(3) gives the financial institution a reasonable opportunity to act on the process.

(c) Creditor process served on a financial institution before it is enforceable against the financial institution under subsection (b) does not create a right of the creditor against the financial institution or a duty of the financial institution to the creditor. Other law determines whether creditor process creates a lien enforceable against the beneficiary on a contingent interest of a beneficiary, including a depositor as a beneficiary, even if not enforceable against the financial institution.

Laws 2025, LB231, § 9.